Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3911.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DIGITIZED VIDEO GRANTS.new text end new text begin $20,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the governing board of the Minnesota Historical Society for a grant to a nonprofit organization to repair and replace technology used to digitize videotape, film, audio, and print materials, including news, commerce, documentaries, and local stories, in order to preserve Minnesota history and share it with the public. The technology repaired or replaced with grant money must be used to convert media to a digital format, and the grantee must allow that material to be shared with the public. new text end